Colorado, session 2026A, HB1029.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-1-102, amend (3)
and (4); and add (3.5) and (9) as follows:
23-1-102. Commission established - terms of office - definition.
(3) (a) The commission consists of the following members,
appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate:
(I) One member from each congressional district in the state; and
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(II) Three members from the state at large;
(III) ONE STUDENT MEMBER WHO, AT THE TIME OF APPOINTMENT, IS
ENROLLED AS A STUDENT AT A STATE-SUPPORTED GRADUATE RESEARCH
UNIVERSITY OR A STATE-SUPPORTED FOUR-YEAR INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION; AND
(IV) ONE STUDENT MEMBER WHO, AT THE TIME OF APPOINTMENT, IS
ENROLLED AS A STUDENT AT A STATE-SUPPORTED COMMUNITY COLLEGE,
LOCAL DISTRICT COLLEGE, OR AREA TECHNICAL COLLEGE.
(b) The governor shall select the members of the commission on the
basis of their knowledge of and interest in higher education. At least one
member of the commission WHO IS NOT A STUDENT MEMBER must reside
west of the continental divide. No more than a minimum majority of the
members of the commission may be affiliated with the same political party
at any time. TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE COMMISSION MEMBERSHIP
MUST INCLUDE PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES AND REFLECT THE RACIAL AND
ETHNIC DIVERSITY OF THE STATE. A STUDENT MEMBER APPOINTED
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION IS A NONVOTING MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION.
(c) The term of each NON-STUDENT member is four years, AND THE
TERM OF A STUDENT MEMBER IS TWO YEARS; except that the terms shall be
ARE staggered so that no more than a minimum majority of members' terms
expire in the same year. No member of the commission may serve more
than two consecutive full four-year terms. A STUDENT MEMBER WHO
GRADUATES FROM THE STUDENT'S STATE-SUPPORTED INSTITUTION OF
HIGHER EDUCATION DURING THE STUDENT'S TERM MAY CONTINUE TO SERVE
ON THE COMMISSION THROUGH THE NATURAL EXPIRATION DATE OF THE
STUDENT MEMBER'S TERM.
(3.5) (a) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, THE GOVERNOR SHALL MAKE
THE INITIAL APPOINTMENTS OF STUDENT MEMBERS.
(b) IF A STUDENT MEMBER APPOINTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(3)(a)(III) OF THIS SECTION WITHDRAWS FROM EITHER A STATE-SUPPORTED
GRADUATE RESEARCH UNIVERSITY OR A STATE-SUPPORTED FOUR-YEAR
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION AND DOES NOT IMMEDIATELY
RE-ENROLL AS A STUDENT AT A DIFFERENT STATE-SUPPORTED GRADUATE
RESEARCH UNIVERSITY OR STATE-SUPPORTED FOUR-YEAR INSTITUTION OF
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1029

HIGHER EDUCATION, THEN A VACANCY IS CREATED. IF A STUDENT MEMBER
APPOINTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3)(a)(IV) OF THIS SECTION
WITHDRAWS FROM A STATE-SUPPORTED COMMUNITY COLLEGE, LOCAL
DISTRICT COLLEGE, OR AREA TECHNICAL COLLEGE AND DOES NOT
IMMEDIATELY RE-ENROLL AS A STUDENT AT A DIFFERENT STATE-SUPPORTED
COMMUNITY COLLEGE, LOCAL DISTRICT COLLEGE, OR AREA TECHNICAL
COLLEGE, THEN A VACANCY IS CREATED. THE GOVERNOR SHALL FILL A
VACANCY CREATED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (3.5)(b) BY APPOINTING
A NEW STUDENT MEMBER FOR THE REMAINDER OF THE UNEXPIRED TERM.
(4) (a) At the time of appointment, no A member of the commission
shall MUST NOT have been an officer, employee, or member of a governing
board or an officer or employee of any A state-supported institution of
higher education in the state for a period of one year prior to his or her THE
MEMBER'S appointment. During his or her A MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION'S
term of office, no THE member of the commission shall MUST NOT be a
member of the general assembly or an officer, employee, or member of a
governing board or an officer or employee of a state-supported institution
of higher education.
(b) THE REQUIREMENTS IN SUBSECTION (4)(a) OF THIS SECTION
REGARDING CONNECTIONS WITH A GOVERNING BOARD OR STATE-SUPPORTED
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION DO NOT APPLY TO A STUDENT MEMBER.
(9) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES, "STUDENT MEMBER" MEANS A MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION
APPOINTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3)(a)(III), (3)(a)(IV), OR (3.5) OF
THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-1-103, amend (1)
introductory portion and (1)(b) as follows:
23-1-103. Advisory committee to the Colorado commission on
higher education.
(1) There is hereby established an advisory committee to the
commission for the purpose of suggesting solutions for the problems and
needs of higher education and maintaining liaison with the general assembly
and the governing boards for state-supported institutions of higher
education. The advisory committee shall consist CONSISTS of not less than
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1029

thirteen TWELVE members, to be designated as follows:
(b) One member shall be selected and designated by the commission
to represent the faculty in the state and one member shall be selected and
designated by the commission to represent the students in the state. On and
after August 5, 2009, THE COMMISSION SHALL SELECT AND DESIGNATE ONE
MEMBER TO REPRESENT THE FACULTY IN THE STATE. The commission shall
select and designate one member who, at the time of designation, is a parent
of a student who is enrolled in a state-supported institution of higher
education in Colorado to represent the parents of students.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 23-1-105.5, amend
(1)(a) as follows:
23-1-105.5. Duties and powers of the commission with respect
to student fees - report on tuition and fees.
(1) (a) The commission shall adopt policies concerning the
collection and use of student fees by the governing boards of the state
institutions of higher education, as defined in section 23-5-119.5. The
policies may address, but need not be limited to, the purposes for student
fees; categories of student fees; the distinctions between tuition revenue and
student fee revenue; accounting for student fee revenue; student fee fund
balances; the minimum level of student involvement in the processes for
establishing, reviewing, changing the amount of, and discontinuing student
fees; and student fees that apply to a student concurrently enrolled pursuant
to article 35 of title 22. In preparing the policies, the commission shall seek
input from the governing boards, the state institutions of higher education,
and the student representative to the advisory committee created pursuant
to section 23-1-103 and representatives of the student governments at the
state institutions of higher education.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date. (1) Except
as otherwise provided in this section, this act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on
the day following the expiration of the ninety-day period after final
adjournment of the general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine
die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed
pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state constitution against this act
or an item, section, or part of this act within such period, then the act, item,
section, or part will not take effect unless approved by the people at the
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1029

general election to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take
effect on the date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the
governor.
(2) Section 2 of this act takes effect only if Senate Bill 26-078 does
not become law, in which case section 2 takes effect on the applicable
effective date of this act.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1029